Maryland, session 2026, HB0553.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
12–811.
(a) If an inspection discloses that an elevator unit complies with the Safety Code
and other regulations adopted by the Commissioner, the Commissioner shall issue a
certificate to the owner or lessee of the elevator unit.
(b) The certificate shall be posted conspicuously in or on the elevator unit.
(c) While a certificate is in effect, it authorizes the holder to operate the elevator
unit in a building, structure, or place of employment in the State.
(D) (1) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL POST ON THE MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR’S WEBSITE A USER–FRIENDLY, SEARCHABLE DATABASE OF
ACTIVE CERTIFICATES ISSUED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE DATABASE DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL ALLOW A USER TO SEARCH ACTIVE CERTIFICATES BY:
(I) STREET ADDRESS;
(II) CITY; AND
– 1 –

Ch. 397 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(III) COUNTY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 2 –